Massachusetts, session 194th, S547.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 252 of the General Laws is hereby amended by striking section 2,
as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, and inserting in place thereof the following section:-
Section 2.(a) As used in this chapter, the following words shall, unless the context clearly
requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Adulticiding”, the use of pesticides intended to kill adult mosquitoes.
“Disease vector”, any species of mosquito which contributes to the amplification or
transmission of any disease, including Eastern Equine Encephalitis or West Nile Virus, among
human or non-human populations by injection of salivary gland fluid during biting.
of 6

“Larviciding”, the use of pesticides intended to kill larval or pupal mosquitoes.
“PFAS”, a class of fluorinated organic chemicals containing at least one fully fluorinated
carbon atom.
“Source reduction”, a method of managing mosquitoes that relies on reducing or
eliminating the ability of larval habitats to support the development of larvae, including removal
of artificial sources of standing, stagnant water or the restoration of natural flows and wetland
systems to improve access by predators, water quality and overall aquatic health.
(b) There shall be a Mosquito Management Board, in this chapter called the board, which
shall consist of:
(1) 1 employee of the department of environmental protection designated by its
commissioner who shall serve as chair; 1 employee of the department of agriculture designated
by its commissioner; 1 employee of the department of fish and game designated by its
commissioner; and 2 employees of the department of public health designated by its
commissioner, 1 of whom represents environmental health; and
(2) 5 members designated by the secretary of energy and environmental affairs including
1 person representing a statewide land conservation organization or a regional or statewide river
protection organization; 1 person representing beekeepers; 1 person representing a group that
works to protect native pollinators; 1 person who is an expert in pesticides and mosquito control
and 1 person who is an ecological risk assessor with a background in ecotoxicology. Each of the
5 members designated in this paragraph shall be designated for a term of 4 years, except for
persons designated to fill vacancies, who shall serve for the unexpired term. Any member
of 6

appointed under paragraph 2 of this subsection shall be eligible for reappointment, so long as no
specific member shall serve for more than 2 terms.
The designation of any member of said board may be revoked at any time, and in such
case or in case of the resignation or disability of any member their successor shall be designated
in the same manner as in the original designation. The board shall serve in the department of
food and agriculture, and the members thereof shall receive no additional compensation for
service on said board, but shall be entitled to their reasonable traveling and other expenses
incurred in the performance of their duties.
(c) The board shall regulate and oversee all disease vector mosquito management
activities in the commonwealth and prepare a science-based statewide Integrated Pest
Management mosquito-borne disease management plan, hereinafter called the plan. State
agencies and subdivisions including but not limited to mosquito control districts, mosquito
control projects and municipalities shall adhere to the plan when conducting mosquito
management activities.
The plan shall provide an ecologically sustainable approach to the management of
mosquito populations combining cultural, physical, biological and, when strictly necessary to
protect public health, least-toxic chemical control strategies. The plan shall include the
following:
(1) an emphasis on preventative measures to protect humans and livestock from
mosquito-borne diseases, including surveillance, monitoring and public education on eliminating
breeding sites and taking personal protective actions;
of 6

(2) source reduction, including removal of discarded tires and other rubbish, cleaning or
draining of artificial mosquito breeding sites and restoration of streams and wetlands to restore
natural flows and provide access to fish and other mosquito predators, shall be the preferred
management measures;
(3) larvicide use shall be limited to locations where disease-bearing mosquitoes are
present and source reduction has been implemented;
(4) adulticides shall only be applied to abate disease-bearing mosquitoes where all other
methods have been implemented and the disease risk is high or critical as determined by the
department of public health;
(5) aerial application of mosquito-control adulticides is prohibited;
(6) ground adulticide applications shall be limited to locations where mosquito-borne
disease is detected in the current year in mosquitoes, other animals or humans; and
(7) use of larvicides or adulticides containing PFAS or other fluorinated compounds is
prohibited.
The board shall post a public notice of availability of the draft plan in the environmental
monitor and provide a 60-day public comment period. The board shall duly consider and respond
to comments received and finalize the plan. The plan shall be updated every 3 years, or more
frequently, with public review. Annual operational plans and practices of any public entity
conducting mosquito management activities shall be consistent with the statewide plan and
revised annually based on efficacy data and mitigation of non-target impacts.
of 6

The board shall annually review and certify integrated pest management mosquito
management plans submitted by mosquito districts or projects, municipalities and any other
public agency conducting mosquito management activities; ensure consistency with the
statewide plan; create policies and oversee procedures for monitoring and responding to vector-
borne diseases; advise the governor when a public health emergency arises due to disease-
bearing mosquitoes imminently threatening to public health; authorize and carry out
investigations and keep records; and carry out disease-bearing mosquito management programs
when a significant area of the state is affected.
The board shall provide statewide education on mosquito borne diseases, best practices
for eliminating artificial standing water and personal protection measures to avoid mosquito
bites. The board shall ensure that all municipalities are provided with access to mosquito
surveillance upon request with payment of reasonable fees. Municipalities and landowners shall
have the right to opt out of larviciding or adulticiding except following a public health
emergency declared by the governor that includes a finding that disease-bearing mosquitoes are
present at high or critical risk levels determined by the department of public health in the
locations to be treated.
The board shall annually publish, on the commonwealth’s website, activities and
expenditures of the board and mosquito control districts or projects and the efficacy and impacts
of the work.
SECTION 2. Section 5A of said chapter 252, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 82 and 88, in each instance, the following words:- state reclamation
of 6

SECTION 3. Section 5B of said chapter 252, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 22, the following words:- state reclamation
SECTION 4. Said section 5B of said chapter 252, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 25, the following word:- reclamation
SECTION 5. Section 14C of said chapter 252, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in lines 4 and 5, the following words:- state reclamation
SECTION 6. Section 24 of said chapter 252, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
striking out, in line 1, the words “state reclamation” and inserting in place thereof the following
100 words:- mosquito management
of 6